Maryland, session 2026, HB0492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–206.
(A) THERE IS A MINIMUM ADEQUATE SECURITY STANDARD FOR
COURTROOM SECURITY AT ALL COURTHOUSE FACILITIES IN THE STATE.
(B) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, A COURT SECURITY OFFICER
MUST MEET THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR A SPECIAL PEACE POLICE OFFICER AS
DEFINED IN § 3–301 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(C) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, DURING COURT PROCEEDINGS, ANY ENTITY
RESPONSIBLE FOR PROVIDING COURTHOUSE SECURITY SHALL USE BEST EFFORTS
TO HAVE PRESENT A MINIMUM OF:
(1) ONE COURT SECURITY OFFICER IN EACH COURTROOM FOR ANY
CRIMINAL, FAMILY, OR JUVENILE PROCEEDING;
(2) TWO COURT SECURITY OFFICERS IN EACH COURTROOM FOR ANY
PROCEEDING INVOLVING AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
MAY BE REMANDED TO CUSTODY AS A RESULT OF THE PROCEEDING; AND
(3) ONE ADDITIONAL COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR EVERY FOUR OR
FEWER COURTROOMS ON EACH FLOOR OF A COURTHOUSE.
– 1 –

Ch. 475 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2029, DURING COURT PROCEEDINGS, ANY ENTITY
RESPONSIBLE FOR PROVIDING COURTHOUSE SECURITY SHALL USE BEST EFFORTS
TO HAVE PRESENT A MINIMUM OF:
(1) ONE COURT SECURITY OFFICER IN EACH COURTROOM FOR ANY
TYPE OF PROCEEDING;
(2) TWO COURT SECURITY OFFICERS IN EACH COURTROOM FOR ANY
PROCEEDING INVOLVING AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO
MAY BE REMANDED INTO CUSTODY AS A RESULT OF THE PROCEEDING; AND
(3) ONE ADDITIONAL COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR EVERY FOUR OR
FEWER COURTROOMS ON EACH FLOOR OF A COURTHOUSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –